Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.050

Damage to underground facility—Notification by excavator—Repairs or relocation of facility.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5627-S.SL) ***

(1) An excavator who, in the course of excavation, contacts or damages an underground facility shall notify the facility operator and a one-number locator service, and report the damage as required under RCW 19.122.053. If the damage causes an emergency condition, the excavator causing the damage shall also call 911 to alert the appropriate local public safety agencies and take all appropriate steps to ensure the public safety. No damaged underground facility may be buried until it is repaired or relocated.

(2) A facility operator notified in accordance with subsection (1) of this section shall arrange for repairs or relocation as soon as is practical, or permit the excavator to do necessary repairs or relocation at a mutually acceptable price.

[ 2020 c 162 s 2; 2011 c 263 s 9; 1984 c 144 s 5.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.